Louisiana, session 2026, HB892.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.70.11. West End Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created within the parishes of Jefferson and Orleans, as
more specifically provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and
corporate which shall be known as the West End Economic Development District,
referred to in this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political
subdivision of the state as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The boundaries of the district shall encompass the following area:
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
(1) State Water Bottom Leases (West End Parking Lot)
That certain piece or portion of ground, together with all the buildings and
improvements thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes,
appurtenances and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining,
situated township 12 south range 11 east, in the parish of Jefferson, state of
Louisiana, is more fully described as follows:
Commencing at the westerly and northerly point on a bulkhead running west
to east along the projection of the northerly side of north roadway street having a
coordinate of x=3,664,526.07 and y=556,664.20, said point lies in Jefferson parish
and is also known as the point of beginning, thence along said bulkhead south 43
degrees 31 minutes 18 seconds west a distance of 43.08 feet to a point, thence
continuing along said bulkhead, south 01 degrees 16 minutes 43 seconds west a
distance of 480.10 feet to a point, thence leaving said bulkhead south 01 degrees 16
minutes 43 seconds west a distance of 59.11 feet to a point, thence south 69 degrees
37 minutes 01 seconds west a distance of 115.92 feet to a point, thence north 19
degrees 05 minutes 21 seconds west a distance of 161.44 feet to a point, thence north
00 degrees 15 minutes 44 seconds west a distance of 323.44 feet to a point, thence
south 89 degrees 44 minutes 05 seconds west a distance of 22.98 feet to a point,
thence north 00 degrees 21 minutes 43 seconds west a distance of 216.31 feet to a
point, thence north 51 degrees 38 minutes 44 seconds east a distance of 138.21 feet
to a point, thence north 89 degrees 43 minutes 14 seconds east a distance of 205.23
feet to a point, thence south 03 degrees 30 minutes 34 seconds west a distance of
161.08 feet to a point on a bulkhead, thence along said bulkhead south 84 degrees
28 minutes 50 seconds west a distance of 77.85 feet to the point of beginning
containing an area of the lake Pontchartrain water bottom of 3.368 acres (146,719
sqft). All as per survey by Batture LLC dated March 25,2026.
(2) West End Parking Lot Parcel
That certain piece or portion of ground, together with all the buildings and
improvements thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes,
appurtenances and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining,
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
situated in the parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana, in that part thereof known as the
seventh district of the city of new Orleans, a portion of the municipal yacht harbor,
is more fully described as follows:
Commencing at the westerly and northerly point on a bulkhead running west
to east along the projection of the northerly side of north roadway street having a
coordinate of x=3,664,526.07 and y=556,664.20, said point lies in Jefferson parish
and is also known as the point of commencement, thence along said bulkhead north
84 degrees 28 minutes 50 seconds east a distance of 77.86 feet to an arrow cut on the
boundary line of Jefferson parish and Orleans parish, also known as the point of
beginning, thence north 84 degrees 28 minutes 21 seconds east a distance of 92.52
feet to a point on the westerly curb of west roadway street, thence along a curve to
the right having a chord bearing of south 24 degrees 54 minutes 40 seconds east,
chord length of 140.38 feet, arc length of 141.11 feet and radius of 400.0 feet to an
arrow cut, thence south 36 degrees 46 minutes 28 seconds east a distance of 47.42
feet to a cross cut, thence along a curve to the left having a chord bearing of south
21 degrees 54 minutes 47 seconds east, chord length of 211.89 feet, arc length of
214.58 feet and radius of 390.0 feet to a cross cut, thence south 07 degrees 28
minutes 40 seconds east a distance of 119.75 feet to a cross cut, thence south 05
degrees 53 minutes 47 seconds east a distance of 66.54 feet to a cross cut, thence
south 83 degrees 23 minutes 53 seconds west a distance of 318.47 feet to a cross cut
on the boundary line of Jefferson parish and Orleans parish, thence along said
boundary line north 03 degrees 30 minutes 34 seconds east a distance 575.67 feet to
the point of beginning, containing an area of 2.998 acres (130,596- sqft). All as per
survey by Batture LLC dated March 25, 2026.
(3) Northern Parcel
That certain piece or portion of ground, together with all the buildings and
improvements thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes,
appurtenances and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining,
situated in the parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana, in that part thereof known as the
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
seventh district of the city of new Orleans, a portion of the municipal yacht harbor,
is more fully described as follows:
Commencing at the westerly and northerly point on a bulkhead running west
to east along the projection of the northerly side of north roadway street having a
coordinate of x=3,664,526.07 and y=556,664.20, said point lies in Jefferson parish
and is also known as the point of commencement, thence along said bulkhead north
84 degrees 28 minutes 50 seconds east a distance of 77.86 feet to an arrow cut on the
boundary line of Jefferson parish and Orleans parish, also known as the point of
beginning, thence north 03 degrees 30 minutes 34 seconds east feet along the
boundary line of Jefferson and Orleans parish a distance of 251.00 to a point, thence
leaving said boundary line south 87 degrees 52 minutes 33 seconds east a distance
of 74.94 feet to a point on the westerly curb of breakwater drive, thence along said
curb south 03 degrees 43 minutes 59 seconds west a distance of 134.20 feet to a
point, thence along a curve to the right having a chord bearing of south 05 degrees
45 minutes 22 seconds east, chord length of 105.46 feet, arc length of 105.70 feet
and a radius of 450 feet to a point, thence north 84 degrees 28 minutes 21 seconds
east a distance of 92.52 feet to the point of beginning, containing an area of 0.437
acres (19,024 sqft). All as per survey by Batture LLC dated March 25, 2026.
(4) Northern Water Bottom Parcel
That certain piece or portion of ground, together with all the buildings and
improvements thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes,
appurtenances and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining,
situated in the parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana, in that part thereof known as the
seventh district of the city of new Orleans, a portion of the municipal yacht harbor,
is more fully described as follows:
Commencing at the westerly and northerly point on a bulkhead running west
to east along the projection of the northerly side of north roadway street having a
coordinate of x=3,664,526.07 and y=556,664.20, said point lies in Jefferson parish
and is also known as the point of commencement, thence along said bulkhead north
84 degrees 28 minutes 50 seconds east a distance of 77.86 feet to an arrow cut on the
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
boundary line of Jefferson parish and Orleans parish, thence along said boundary line
north 03 degrees 30 minutes 34 seconds east a distance of 161.08 feet to a point also
known as the point of beginning, thence along said boundary line north 03 degrees
30 minutes 34 seconds east a distance of 89.92 feet, thence leaving said boundary
line north 87 degrees 52 minutes 33 seconds west a distance of 91.80 feet to a point,
thence south 51 degrees 38 minutes 44 seconds west a distance of 151.74 feet, thence
south 89 degrees 43 minutes 14 seconds east a distance of 205.23 feet to the point
of beginning, containing an area of 0.315 acres (13,729 sqft). All as per survey by
Batture LLC dated March 25, 2026.
(5) State Property (Jefferson Parish Jurisdiction) (West End Parking Lot)
That certain piece or portion of ground, together with all the buildings and
improvements thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes,
appurtenances and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining,
situated township 12 south range 11 east, in the parish of Jefferson, state of
Louisiana, is more fully described as follows:
Commencing at the westerly and northerly point on a bulkhead running west
to east along the projection of the northerly side of north roadway street having a
coordinate of x=3,664,526.07 and y=556,664.20, said point lies in Jefferson parish
and is also known as the point of beginning, thence along said bulkhead north 84
degrees 28 minutes 50 seconds east a distance of 77.86 feet to an arrow cut on the
boundary line of Jefferson parish and Orleans parish, thence along said boundary line
south 03 degrees 30 minutes 34 seconds west a distance of 575.67 feet to a cross cut,
thence south 83 degrees 23 minutes 53 seconds west to a point, thence north 00
degrees 36 minutes 24 seconds west a distance of 63.73 feet to a point, thence south
89 degrees 23 minutes 30 seconds west a distance of 15.82 feet to a point on the edge
of a bulkhead abutting lake Pontchartrain, thence along said bulkhead north 01
degrees 16 minutes 43 seconds east a distance of 480.10 feet to a point, thence
continuing along said bulkhead north 43 degrees 31 minutes 18 seconds east a
distance of 43.08 feet to the point of beginning containing an area of 1.217 acres
(52,999 sqft). All as per survey by Batture LLC dated March 25, 2026.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
C.(1) The district is established for the primary object and purpose of
promoting and encouraging economic and commercial development and tourism
opportunities, stimulating the economy through renewed commerce, industry,
research, and tourism, and for the utilization and development of natural and human
resources of the area by providing job opportunities.
(2) Nothing shall prohibit the district from providing public infrastructure
outside the boundaries of the district that generally benefits the public.
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred
to in this Section as the "board", consisting of five members as follows:
(a) The member of the governing authority of the parish of Jefferson who
represents District No. 5 shall appoint two members.
(b) The member of the governing authority of the city of New Orleans who
represents District A shall appoint two members.
(c) The president of the governing authority of the city of New Orleans shall
appoint one member.
(2) Members of the board shall serve five-year terms after initial terms as
provided in this Paragraph. One member shall serve an initial term of one year; one
shall serve two years; one shall serve three years; one shall serve four years; and one
shall serve five years, as determined by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(3) Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of the term for which
a member of the board has been appointed shall be filled for the remainder of the
unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.
(4) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, a
secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as it may deem necessary. The duties
of the officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(5) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
secretary of the board. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the
official custody of the board.
(6) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. It shall hold regular meetings as shall
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
be provided for in the bylaws and may hold special meetings at such times and
places within the district as may be prescribed in the bylaws.
(7) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make
them available through the secretary of the board to residents of the district.
(8) The members of the board shall serve without compensation; however,
they may be reimbursed for expenses incurred while attending to the business of the
board or the district.
E. The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise all
powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for carrying out its objects
and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
(4) To receive by gift, grant, or donation any sum of money, property, aid,
or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any political
subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(5) To enter into contracts, agreements, or cooperative endeavors with the
state and its political subdivisions or political corporations and with any public or
private association, corporation, business entity, or individual.
(6) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties; and
fix their compensation.
(7) To acquire by purchase, gift, grant, donation, or lease property as may
be necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the board.
(8) To perform any other necessary and ancillary acts to effectuate its
functions, to perform its duties, or to give effect to its powers in accordance with this
Section.
F.(1) In addition to the authority provided to the district by this Section, the
district may levy and collect a sales and use tax within the boundaries of the district
not to exceed two percent.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
(2) The tax shall be imposed by resolution of the board and shall be levied
upon the sale at retail, the use, the lease or rental, the consumption, the distribution,
and the storage for use or consumption of tangible personal property or digital
products and upon the sales of services within the boundaries of the district, all as
defined in R.S. 47:301 et seq. The purpose and rate of the tax shall be as provided
in the resolution.
(3) Except where inapplicable, the procedure established by R.S. 47:301 et
seq. shall be followed in the imposition, collection, and enforcement of the tax, and
procedural details necessary to supplement those Sections and to make them
applicable to the tax authorized in this Subsection shall be fixed in the resolution
imposing the tax.
(4) The tax shall be imposed and collected uniformly throughout the
jurisdiction of the district.
(5) The tax levied pursuant to this Subsection shall be in addition to all other
taxes other political subdivisions within the jurisdiction of the district are authorized
to levy and collect.
(6) Any monies received by the district shall be used exclusively for the
benefit of the district and to fund economic development projects and infrastructure
improvement projects within the following described boundaries:
That portion of the protection or revetment levee bordering on Lake
Pontchartrain, and lying between the west bank of the New Basin Canal on the east,
and shore of Lake Pontchartrain on the west; all lands now lying under the waters of
Lake Pontchartrain between the protection or revetment levee on the south; the west
bank of the New Basin Canal on the East, the shore of Lake Pontchartrain on the
west and a line drawn parallel to and in front of said protection or revetment levee,
a distance of three thousand feet therefrom on the north; all lands now lying under
the waters of Lake Pontchartrain in the rear or south of the aforesaid protection or
revetment levee on the north, the shore of Lake Pontchartrain on the south and the
lands belonging to private persons on the east and west.
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 892 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.